Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 3. Secondary State Highway System.

§ 33.2-324.
Secondary state highway system; composition.

The secondary state highway system shall consist of all of the public highways, causeways, bridges, landings, and wharves in the counties of the Commonwealth not included in the primary state highway system. The secondary state highway system shall include such highways and community roads leading to and from public school buildings, streets, causeways, bridges, landings, and wharves in towns having a population of 3,500 or less according to the United States census of 1920, and in all towns having such a population incorporated since 1920, that constitute connecting links between highways in the secondary state highway system in the counties and between highways in the secondary state highway system and highways in the primary state highway system, not to exceed two miles in any one town. If in any such town that is partly surrounded by water less than two miles of the highways and streets therein constitute parts of the secondary state highway system, the Board shall, upon the adoption of a resolution by the governing body of such town designating for inclusion in the secondary state highway system certain highways and streets in such town not to exceed a distance of two miles, less the length of such highways and streets in such town that constitute parts of the secondary state highway system, accept and place in the secondary state highway system such additional highways and streets.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-44; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-67; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-325.
Certain school roads in secondary state highway system.

All roads leading from the state highways, either primary or secondary, to public schools in the counties of the Commonwealth to which school buses are operated shall continue to constitute portions of the secondary state highway system insofar as these roads lead to or are on school property and as such shall be improved and maintained.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-45; 1952, c. 505; 1964, c. 380; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-68; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-326.
Control, supervision, and management of secondary state highway system components.

The control, supervision, management, and jurisdiction over the secondary state highway system shall be vested in the Department, and the maintenance and improvement, including construction and reconstruction, of such secondary state highway system shall be by the Commonwealth under the supervision of the Commissioner of Highways. The boards of supervisors or other governing bodies of the counties shall have no control, supervision, management, or jurisdiction over such public highways, causeways, bridges, landings, and wharves constituting the secondary state highway system. Except as otherwise provided in this article, the Board shall be vested with the same powers, control, and jurisdiction over the secondary state highway system in the counties and towns of the Commonwealth, and such additions as may be made, as were vested in the boards of supervisors or other governing bodies of the counties on June 21, 1932, and in addition thereto shall be vested with the same power, authority, and control as to the secondary state highway system as is vested in the Board in connection with the primary state highway system.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the Department, when undertaking improvements to any secondary state highway system component or any portion of any such component, to fully reconstruct such component or portion thereof to bring it into compliance with all design and engineering standards that would be applicable to such component or portion thereof if the project involved new construction.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-46; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-69; 2008, Sp. Sess. II, c. 3; 2014, c. 805.

Cross references.

As to powers of local service districts, see §

15.2-2403

.

Law Review.

For note, “Virginia Subdivision Law: An Unreasonable Burden on the Unwary,” see 34 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1223 (1977).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Reclamation of ownership of road. —

The Attorney General declined to issue an opinion as to whether the Department of Transportation, should it reclaim ownership of a road, was required to use the original roadbed or if it could condemn that portion of the road which no longer followed the original roadbed as the Department of Transportation has exclusive jurisdiction over all roads in the secondary system of state highways. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable H. Morgan Griffith, Member, House of Delegates, 99-091 (1/10/00) (decided under prior law).

§ 33.2-327.
Design standards for secondary state highway system components.

For urban and urban development areas in localities using the urban county executive form of government, the Department shall work in conjunction with the locality and the Department of Rail and Public Transportation to review new design standards for secondary state highway system components that the locality proposes. Such standards shall (i) be based on the American Association of State Highway and Transportation Officials (AASHTO) A Policy on Geometric Design of Highways and Streets and other publications applicable to urban areas; (ii) set forth a design methodology that should be used in the affected urban and urban development areas; (iii) allow for the efficient movement of transit and other vehicles through these areas; (iv) accommodate safe pedestrian and bicyclist movement; (v) accommodate high density urban development; (vi) encourage user-friendly access to transit; (vii) include stormwater management guidelines, consistent with state and local laws and regulations; and (viii) respect the character of urban areas. These design standards and methodologies are intended to facilitate approval of roadway and transportation system improvement plans in urban areas that comply with the standards. These design standards shall not contradict or be in conflict with the principles outlined in the applicable Board regulations concerning terms and conditions under which subdivision streets may be accepted into the secondary state highway system.

Standards developed by parties as required by this section shall be submitted to the Department for final review and approval at least three months prior to the locality’s anticipated implementation date.

History.

2010, c. 498, § 33.1-69.001; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-328.
Department of Transportation to install and maintain certain signs.

Whenever so requested by the governing body of a county, the Department shall install a system of highway name signs on state-maintained highways at such time and upon such terms and conditions as may be mutually agreed to between the county and the Commissioner of Highways.

The Department shall install, using state forces or contract, the initial signing system, and the county shall be responsible for continuing maintenance of the signs. Supply of the signs by the Department, either by manufacture or purchase, and initial installation shall be paid for from funds available to the Department for highway maintenance.

No highway funds shall be used by the county for the cost of maintaining the signing system.

History.

1993, c. 340, § 33.1-69.01; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 684.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 684 substituted “funds available to the Department for highway maintenance” for “appropriate secondary construction funds allocated to the county or from primary construction funds available to the Department” in the second paragraph.

§ 33.2-329.
Transfer of control, etc., of landings, docks, and wharves to Department of Wildlife Resources.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Board may transfer the control, possession, supervision, management, and jurisdiction of landings, wharves, and docks in the secondary state highway system to the Department of Wildlife Resources, at the request or with the concurrence of the Department of Wildlife Resources. Such transfer may be by lease, agreement, or otherwise, approved by resolution of the Board, and signed by the Commissioner of Highways or his designee, for such period and upon such terms and conditions as the Board may direct.

All such transfers effected prior to July 1, 1980, by lease, agreement, or otherwise, from the Department to the Department of Wildlife Resources and all regulations of the Department of Wildlife Resources controlling the use of such facilities shall be and are hereby declared valid in every respect.

History.

1980, c. 301, § 33.1-69.1; 2014, c. 805; 2020, c. 958.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958, substituted “Department of Wildlife Resources” for “Department of Game and Inland Fisheries” wherever it appears.

§ 33.2-330.
Relocation or removal of utility facilities within secondary state highway system construction projects.

As used in this section:“Cost of highway construction” includes the cost of relocating or removing utility facilities in connection with any project on the secondary state highway system.“Cost of relocation or removal” includes the entire amount paid by such utility properly attributable to such relocation or removal after deducting therefrom any increase in the value of the new facility and any salvage value derived from the old facility.“Facility of a utility” includes tracks, pipes, mains, conduits, cables, wires, towers, and other structures, equipment, and appliances.“Utility” includes utilities owned by a county, city, town, or public authority, and nonprofit, consumer-owned company located in a county having a population of at least 30,000 but no more than 34,000 that (i) is exempt from income taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, (ii) is organized to provide suitable drinking water, (iii) has no assistance from investors, (iv) does not pay dividends, and (v) does not sell stock to the general public.

Whenever it is necessary that the facility of a utility in, on, under, over, or along an existing highway that is to be included within any construction project on the secondary state highway system should be relocated or removed, the owner or operator of such facility shall relocate or remove the same in accordance with the order of the Board. The cost of such relocation or removal, including the cost of installing such facility in a new location, and the cost of any lands, or any rights or interest in lands, and any other rights, required to accomplish such relocation or removal shall be ascertained and paid by the Board as a part of the cost of such project.

History.

1995, cc. 680, 688, § 33.1-69.2; 1999, c. 942; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 168.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 168 in subsection A, substituted “30,000” for “32,000” in the definition of “Utility.”

§ 33.2-331.
Annual meeting with county officers; six-year plan for secondary state highways; certain reimbursements required.

For purposes of this section, “cancellation” means complete elimination of a highway construction or improvement project from the six-year plan.

The governing body of each county in the secondary state highway system may, jointly with the representatives of the Department as designated by the Commissioner of Highways, prepare a six-year plan for the improvements to the secondary state highway system in that county. Each such six-year plan shall be based upon the best estimate of funds to be available to the county for expenditure in the six-year period on the secondary state highway system. Each such plan shall list the proposed improvements, together with an estimated cost of each project so listed. Following the preparation of the plan in any year in which a proposed new funding allocation is greater than $100,000, the board of supervisors or other local governing body shall conduct a public hearing after publishing notice in a newspaper published in or having general circulation in the county once a week for two successive weeks and posting notice of the proposed hearing at the front door of the courthouse of such county 10 days before the meeting. At the public hearings, which shall be conducted jointly by the board of supervisors and the representative of the Department, the entire six-year plan shall be discussed with the citizens of the county and their views considered. Following the discussion, the local governing body, together with the representative of the Department, shall finalize and officially adopt the six-year plan, which shall then be considered the official plan of the county.

At least once in each calendar year in which a proposed new funding allocation is greater than $100,000, representatives of the Department in charge of the secondary state highway system in each county, or some representative of the Department designated by the Commissioner of Highways, shall meet with the governing body of each county in a regular or special meeting of the local governing body for the purpose of preparing a budget for the expenditure of improvement funds for the next fiscal year. The representative of the Department shall furnish the local governing body with an updated estimate of funds, and the board and the representative of the Department shall jointly prepare the list of projects to be carried out in that fiscal year taken from the six-year plan by order of priority and following generally the policies of the Board in regard to the statewide improvements to the secondary state highway system. In any year in which a proposed new funding allocation is greater than $100,000, such list of priorities shall then be presented at a public hearing duly advertised in accordance with the procedure outlined in this section, and comments of citizens shall be obtained and considered. Following this public hearing, the board, with the concurrence of the representative of the Department, shall adopt, as official, a priority program for the ensuing year, and the Department shall include such listed projects in its secondary highways budget for the county for that year.

At least once every two years following the adoption of the original six-year plan, the governing body of each county, together with the representative of the Department, may update the six-year plan of the county by adding to it and extending it as necessary so as to maintain it as a plan encompassing six years. Whenever additional funds for secondary highway purposes become available, the local governing body may request a revision in its six-year plan in order that such plan be amended to provide for the expenditure of the additional funds. Such additions and extensions to each six-year plan shall be prepared in the same manner and following the same procedures as outlined herein for its initial preparation. Where the local governing body and the representative of the Department fail to agree upon a priority program, the local governing body may appeal to the Commissioner of Highways. The Commissioner of Highways shall consider all proposed priorities and render a decision establishing a priority program based upon a consideration by the Commissioner of Highways of the welfare and safety of county citizens. Such decision shall be binding.

Nothing in this section shall preclude a local governing body, with the concurrence of the representative of the Department, from combining the public hearing that may be required pursuant to this section for revision of a six-year plan with the public hearing that may be required pursuant to this section for review of the list of priorities, provided that notice of such combined hearing is published in accordance with procedures provided in this section.

All such six-year plans shall consider all existing highways in the secondary state highway system, including those in the towns located in the county that are maintained as a part of the secondary state highway system, and shall be made a public document.

If any county cancels any highway construction or improvement project included in its six-year plan after the location and design for the project has been approved, such county shall reimburse the Department the net amount of all funds expended by the Department for planning, engineering, right-of-way acquisition, demolition, relocation, and construction between the date on which project development was initiated and the date of cancellation. To the extent that funds from secondary highway allocations have been expended to pay for a highway construction or improvement project, all revenues generated from a reimbursement by the county shall be deposited into that same county’s secondary highway allocation. The Commissioner of Highways may waive all or any portion of such reimbursement at his discretion.

The provisions of this section shall not apply in instances where less than 100 percent of the right-of-way is available for donation for unpaved highway improvements.

History.

Code 1950; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-70.01; 1977, c. 578; 1979, c. 64; 1981, c. 240; 1993, c. 802; 2001, cc. 105, 130; 2005, c. 645; 2011, cc. 434, 493; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 684; 2019, cc. 81, 400.

Cross references.

As to adoption of road improvements program by locality, see §

15.2-2321

.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 684 deleted “pursuant to §

33.2-364

” following “To the extent that funds from secondary highway allocations” in the seventh paragraph.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 81 and 400 are identical, and inserted “in any year in which a proposed new funding allocation is greater than $100,000” or similar language once in the second paragraph and twice in the second paragraph; in the fourth paragraph, substituted “may update” for “shall update”; and in the fifth paragraph, twice substituted “hearing that may be required pursuant to this section” for “hearing required.”

§ 33.2-332.
Requesting Department of Transportation to hard-surface secondary highways; paving of certain secondary highways within existing rights-of-way; designation as Rural Rustic Road.

Whenever the governing body of any county, after consultation with personnel of the Department, adopts a resolution requesting the Department to hard-surface any secondary highway in such county that carries 50 or more vehicles per day with a hard surface of width and strength adequate for such traffic volume, the Department shall give consideration to such resolution in establishing priority in expending the funds allocated to such county. The Department shall consider the paving of highways with a right-of-way width of less than 40 feet under this subsection when land is, has been, or can be acquired by gift for the purpose of constructing a hard-surface highway.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, any unpaved secondary highway that carries at least 50 but no more than 750 vehicles per day may be paved or improved and paved within its existing right-of-way or within a wider right-of-way that is less than 40 feet wide if the following conditions are met:

The governing body of the county in which the highway is located has requested paving of such highway as part of the six-year plan for the county under §

33.2-331

and transmitted that request to the Commissioner of Highways; and

The Commissioner of Highways, after having considered only (i) the safety of such highway in its current condition and in its paved or improved condition, including the desirability of reduced speed limits and installation of other warning signs or devices; (ii) the views of the residents and owners of property adjacent to or served by such highway; (iii) the views of the local governing body making the request; (iv) the historical and aesthetic significance of such highway and its surroundings; (v) the availability of any additional land that has been or may be acquired by gift or other means for the purpose of paving such highway within its existing right-of-way or within a wider right-of-way that is less than 40 feet wide; and (vi) environmental considerations, shall grant or deny the request for the paving of such highway under this subsection.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections A and B, the governing body of any county, in consultation with the Department, may designate a highway or highway segment as a Rural Rustic Road, provided such highway or highway segment is located in a low-density development area and has an average daily traffic volume of no more than 1,500 vehicles per day. For a highway or highway segment so designated, improvements shall utilize a paved surface width based on reduced and flexible standards that leave trees, vegetation, side slopes, and open drainage abutting the highway undisturbed to the maximum extent possible without compromising public safety. Any highway designated as a Rural Rustic Road shall be subject to §

62.1-44.15:34

. The Department, in consultation with the affected local governing body, shall first consider the paving of a highway or highway segment meeting the criteria for a Rural Rustic Road in accordance with this subsection before making a decision to pave it to another standard as set forth in this section.

The Commonwealth and its agencies, instrumentalities, departments, officers, and employees acting within the scope of their duties and authority shall be immune for damages by reason of actions taken in conformity with the provisions of this section. Immunity for the local governing body of any political subdivision requesting paving under this section and the officers and employees of any such political subdivision shall be limited to that immunity provided pursuant to §

15.2-1405

.

History.

1973, c. 360, § 33.1-70.1; 1977, c. 578; 1985, c. 440; 1997, cc. 715, 729; 1999, cc. 306, 320; 2001, cc. 355, 366; 2002, c. 414; 2003, c. 599; 2006, c. 546; 2008, c. 195; 2011, c. 400; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2014, c. 805.

Cross references.

As to speed limits on designated rural rustic roads, see § 46.2-873.2.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, cc. 276 and 704, cl. 1 provides: “In recognition that Loudoun County contains one of the largest and the highest-volume network of rural gravel roads in the Commonwealth at 280 centerline miles, and in recognition of the importance of the contribution that many of these rural gravel roads make to the preservation of the unique cultural and historic heritage of the County and of the Commonwealth, the Department of Transportation shall do the following in carrying out its duties and responsibilities to properly maintain the rural gravel road network in Loudoun County:

“1. Coordinate with the County and with affected residents in order to better understand their specific maintenance concerns and in order to better prioritize how the Department allocates its maintenance budget to address such local concerns;

“2. Continue, whenever practicable, to maintain rural gravel roads in traditional alignment, surface treatment, and width and protect banks, stone walls, and roadside trees in all rural, agricultural, and historic areas;

“3. Apply the Department’s Rural Rustic Road policies in any paving program in rural, agricultural, or historic areas, unless requested otherwise by the County, and focus limited paving resources primarily on highly traveled roads in developed areas; and

“4. Provide an annual report to the County detailing how the Department expended funds in the prior fiscal year for the maintenance of rural gravel roads in the County.”

§ 33.2-333.
Emergency paving of unpaved secondary highways; notice and local concurrence.

In the event of an emergency, an unpaved highway within the secondary state highway system shall be paved only if the following procedures are satisfied:

The Commissioner of Highways shall consider the following factors in determining whether the unpaved secondary highway, as the result of an emergency, shall be paved: (i) the safety of the secondary highway in its current condition; (ii) the feasibility of restoring the unpaved highway to its functional level prior to the emergency; (iii) the concerns of the citizens in the locality wherein the affected highway is located, particularly those persons who own land adjacent to such highway; (iv) the concerns of the governing body of the locality affected; and (v) the historical and aesthetic significance of the unpaved secondary highway and its surroundings.

The Commissioner of Highways shall provide notice of the intended paving to the governing body of the locality where the affected highway or portion thereof is located. The Commissioner shall provide such notice following his decision to pave the unpaved secondary highway within the locality affected.

The local governing body’s concurrence or other recommendation regarding the proposed paving shall be forwarded to the Commissioner of Highways within 72 hours following the receipt of the Commissioner’s notice.

History.

1996, c. 923, § 33.1-70.2; 2011, c. 400; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-334.
Requirements for taking new streets into secondary state highway system.

The governing body of any county that has not withdrawn from the secondary state highway system or any town within which the Department maintains the streets may, by resolution, request the Board to take any new street or highway into the secondary state highway system for maintenance if such street or highway has been developed and constructed in accordance with the Board’s secondary street acceptance requirements. The Board shall adopt regulations establishing such secondary street acceptance requirements, which shall include such provisions as the Board deems necessary or appropriate to achieve the safe and efficient operation of the Commonwealth’s transportation network.

In addition to such other provisions deemed necessary or appropriate by the Board, the regulations shall include (i) requirements to ensure the connectivity of highway and pedestrian networks with the existing and future transportation network, provided that such provisions shall include flexibility to limit the number of connections to adjacent property or highway networks as deemed appropriate; (ii) provisions to minimize stormwater runoff and impervious surface area; and (iii) provisions for performance bonding of new secondary highways and associated cost recovery fees.

No initial regulation establishing secondary street acceptance requirements pursuant to this section shall apply to subdivision plats and subdivision construction plans that have been submitted and accepted for review by the Department on or before the effective date of such initial regulations. No locality shall be obligated to approve any subdivision plat or subdivision construction plans that are inconsistent with these regulations.

Nothing in this section or in any regulation, policy, or practice adopted pursuant to this section shall prevent the acceptance of any street or segment of a street within a network addition that meets one or more of the public service requirements addressed in the regulations, provided that the network addition satisfies all other requirements adopted pursuant to this section. In cases where a majority of the lots along the street or street segment remain undeveloped and construction traffic is expected to utilize that street or street segment after acceptance, the bonding requirement for such street or street segment may be required by the Department to be extended for up to one year beyond that required in the secondary street acceptance requirements.

History.

2007, c. 382, § 33.1-70.3; 2010, c. 401; 2014, c. 805; 2022, c. 425.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 425 added “provided that such provisions shall include flexibility to limit the number of connections to adjacent property or highway networks as deemed appropriate” in subsection B in clause (i) at the end; and made stylistic changes.

§ 33.2-335.
Taking certain streets into secondary state highway system.

For the purposes of this section:“County” means a county in which the secondary state highway system is constructed and maintained by the Department and that has adopted a local ordinance for control of the development of subdivision streets to the necessary standards for acceptance into the secondary state highway system.“Qualifying rural addition cost” means that portion of the estimated engineering and construction cost to improve the street to the minimum standards for acceptance remaining after reducing the total estimated cost by any prorated amount deemed the responsibility of others based on speculative interests.“Rural addition funds” means those funds reserved from the county’s annual allocation of secondary state highway system construction funds, as defined in §

33.2-324

, for the purpose of this section. If such funds are not used by such county for such purpose during the fiscal year they are so allocated, the funds may be held for such purpose for the four succeeding fiscal years. A maximum of five percent of the annual secondary state system highway construction allocation may be reserved by the local governing body for rural additions.“Speculative interest” means that the original developer or a successor developer retains ownership in any lot abutting such street for development or speculative purposes. In instances where it is determined that speculative interest is retained by the original developer, developers, or successor developers and the governing body of the county deems that extenuating circumstances exist, the governing body of the county shall require a pro rata participation by such original developer, developers, or successor developers as prescribed in subsection D as a condition of the county’s recommendation pursuant to this section.“Street” means a street or highway shown on a plat that has been recorded or otherwise opened to public use and used by motor vehicles for at least 20 years and that, for any reason, has not been taken into the secondary state highway system and serves at least three families per mile.

Whenever the governing body of a county recommends in writing to the Department that any street in the county be taken into and become a part of the secondary state highway system in such county, the Department thereupon, within the limit of available funds and the mileage available in such county for the inclusion of highways and streets in the secondary state highway system, shall take such street into the secondary state highway system for maintenance, improvement, construction, and reconstruction if such street, at the time of such recommendation, (i) has a minimum dedicated width of 40 feet or (ii) in the event of extenuating circumstances as determined by the Commissioner of Highways, has a minimum dedicated width of 30 feet. In either case, such streets must have easements appurtenant thereto that conform to the policy of the Board with respect to drainage. After the streets are taken into the secondary state highway system, the Department shall maintain the same in the manner provided by law. However, no such street shall be taken into and become a part of the secondary state highway system unless and until any and all required permits have been obtained and any outstanding fees, charges, or other financial obligations of whatever nature have been satisfied or provision has been made, whether by the posting of a bond or otherwise, for their satisfaction.

Such street shall only be taken into the secondary state highway system if the governing body of the county has identified and made available the funds required to improve the street to the required minimum standards. The county may consider the following options to fund the required improvements for streets accepted under this section:

The governing body of the county may use a portion of the county’s annual secondary state highway system construction allocation designated as rural addition funds to fund the qualifying rural addition costs for qualifying streets if the county agrees to contribute from county revenue or the special assessment of the landowners on the street in question one-half of the qualifying rural addition cost to bring the streets up to the necessary minimum standards for acceptance. No such special assessment of landowners on such streets shall be made unless the governing body of the county receives written declarations from the owners of 75 percent or more of the platted parcels of land abutting upon such streets stating their acquiescence in such assessments. The basis for such special assessments, at the option of the local governing body, shall be either (i) the proportion the value of each abutting parcel bears to the total value of all abutting parcels on such street as determined by the current evaluation of the property for real estate tax purposes, (ii) the proportion the abutting road front footage of each parcel abutting the street bears to the total abutting road front footage of all parcels abutting on the street, or (iii) an equal amount for each parcel abutting on such street. No such special assessment on any parcel shall exceed one-third of the current valuation of such property for real estate tax purposes. Special assessments under this section shall be conducted in the manner provided in Article 2 (§

15.2-2404

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 15.2, mutatis mutandis, for assessments for local improvements.

The governing body of any county may use a portion of its annual secondary state highway system construction allocation designated as rural addition funds to fund the qualifying rural addition cost for qualifying streets within the limitation of funds and the mileage limitation of the Board’s policy on rural additions.

The governing body of any county may use revenues derived from the sale of bonds to finance the construction of rural additions to the secondary state highway system of such county. In addition, from the funds allocated by the Commonwealth for the construction of secondary state highway improvements, such local governing body may use funds allocated within the Board policy for the construction of rural additions to pay principal and interest on bonds associated with rural additions in such county, provided the revenue derived from the sale of such bonds is not used as the county matching contribution under §

33.2-357

. The provisions of this section shall not constitute a debt or obligation of the Board or the Commonwealth.

The governing body of the county may expend general county revenue for the purposes of this section.

The governing body of the county may permit one or more of the landowners on the street in question to pay to the county a sum equal to one-half of the qualifying rural addition cost to bring the street up to the necessary minimum standards for acceptance into the secondary state highway system, which funds the county shall then utilize for such purpose. Thereafter, upon collection of the special assessment of landowners on such street, the county shall use such special assessment funds to reimburse, without interest, the one or more landowners for those funds that they previously advanced to the county to bring the street up to the necessary minimum standards for acceptance.

The governing body of the county may utilize the allocations made to the county in accordance with §

33.2-357

.

In instances where it is determined that speculative interest exists, the basis for the pro rata percentage required of such developer, developers, or successor developers shall be the proportion that the value of the abutting parcels owned or partly owned by the developer, developers, or successor developers bears to the total value of all abutting property as determined by the current valuation of the property for real estate purposes. The pro rata percentage shall be applied to the Department’s total estimated cost to construct such street to the necessary minimum standards for acceptance to determine the amount of costs to be borne by the developer, developers, or successor developers. Property so valuated shall not be assessed in the special assessment for the determination of the individual pro rata share attributable to other properties. Further, when such pro rata participation is accepted by the governing body of the county from such original developer, developers, or successor developers, such amount shall be deducted from the Department’s total estimated cost, and the remainder of such estimated cost, the qualifying rural addition cost, shall then be the basis of determining the assessment under the special assessment provision or determining the amount to be provided by the county when funded from general county revenue under the definition of speculative interest in subsection A or determining the amount to be funded as a rural addition under the definition of qualifying rural addition cost in subsection A.

Acceptance of any street into the secondary state highway system for maintenance, improvement, construction, and reconstruction shall not impose any obligation on the Board to acquire any additional right-of-way or easements should they be necessary by virtue of faulty construction or design.

History.

Code 1950; 1968, c. 601; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-72.1; 1972, c. 393; 1976, c. 391; 1977, cc. 214, 578; 1978, c. 487; 1979, c. 321; 1980, c. 96; 1981, c. 232; 1982, c. 167; 1983, cc. 171, 455; 1984, c. 146; 1987, cc. 156, 207; 1989, c. 274; 1991, c. 250; 1993, c. 71; 1995, c. 416; 1997, c. 740; 1998, cc. 330, 338, 340; 2001, c. 95; 2004, c. 677; 2006, c. 827; 2009, c. 635; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 179.

Cross references.

For present provisions as to allocation of funds for the secondary state highway systems, see §

33.2-358

.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 179 in subsection A, substituted “has been recorded” for “was recorded,” deleted “prior to July 1, 1992, at which time it was open to” following “opened to public use” and inserted “for at least 20 years” in the definition of “Street.”

Law Review.

For note, “Virginia Subdivision Law: An Unreasonable Burden on the Unwary,” see 34 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1223 (1977).

For survey of Virginia property law for the year 1977-1978, see 64 Va. L. Rev. 1513 (1978).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-526 Deed of Subdivision, Dedication, and Easement, et seq.